test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_E.E_STEM_3_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - k̲e.e - ENGLISH : # CLASS_E.E_STEM_3

     k̲e.e+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: k̲e.ée
     k̲e.e+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲e.ée
     k̲e.e+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲e.ée
     k̲e.e+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲e.éeng
     k̲e.e+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲e.éeyaa
     k̲e.e+V+INDIRECT+PAST: k̲e.éeyaan
     k̲e.e+V+RELATIVE: k̲e.ées
     k̲e.e+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: k̲e.éeyaas
     k̲e.e+V+NON_FACTIVE: k̲e.ée.ang
     k̲e.e+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: k̲e.éeyaa.ang
     k̲e.e+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: k̲e.éeäsaa
     k̲e.e+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: k̲e.éeäs
     k̲e.e+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: k̲e.éeäsaang
     k̲e.e+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: k̲e.éeäsga
     k̲e.e+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: k̲e.éeäsaas
     k̲e.e+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲e.éeäsaa.ang
     k̲e.e+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲e.ée.ang k̲asa'áa
     k̲e.e+V+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲e.ée.ang k̲asa'áang
     k̲e.e+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲e.ée.ang k̲asaasdláa
     k̲e.e+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲e.ée.ang k̲asaasdláang
     k̲e.e+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲e.ée'uuj
     k̲e.e+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲e.ée'uujang
     k̲e.e+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: k̲e.éeäsaa'uujang
     k̲e.e+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: k̲e.ée'us
     k̲e.e+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲e.ée'ujaa
     k̲e.e+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲e.ée'uujaangaa
     k̲e.e+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: k̲e.éeäsaa'us
     k̲e.e+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: k̲e.ée'ahlanggang
     k̲e.e+V+CERTAIN+PAST: k̲e.ée'ahlanggan
     k̲e.e+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲e.ée'ahlanggiinii
     k̲e.e+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: k̲e.éeäsaa'ahlans
     k̲e.e+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: k̲e.ée'ahlans
     k̲e.e+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: k̲e.éeyaa'ahlang
     k̲e.e+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: k̲e.éeyaa'ahlanggaa
     k̲e.e+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: k̲e.éeyaa'ahlanggang
     k̲e.e+V+REFLEXIVE: k̲e.ée'ahl
     k̲e.e+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: k̲e.éeäseehl
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲e.ée.ang k̲asaa'áng
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲e.ée.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲e.ée.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲e.ée.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
